ces-rus_present/apertium/apertium-ces/apertium-ces.ces.dix
    <pardef n="tlouš/ť__n">
      <e><p><l>ť</l><r>ť<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ti</l><r>ť<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tě</l><r>ť<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ťů</l><r>ť<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ti</l><r>ť<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ťům</l><r>ť<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tě</l><r>ť<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tě</l><r>ť<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ti</l><r>ť<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ti</l><r>ť<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ti</l><r>ť<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tích</l><r>ť<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>těm</l><r>ť<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ti</l><r>ť<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="nábyt/ek__n">
      <e><p><l>ek</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ku</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ku</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ek</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ku</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ku</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kem</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="demago/g__n">
      <e><p><l>g</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>zi</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gové</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ga</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gů</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gu</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>govi</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gům</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ga</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gy</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gu</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>zi</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gové</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gu</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>govi</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>zích</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gem</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gy</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="BASE__rok">
      <e><p><l>k</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ky</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ku</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ků</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ku</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kům</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>k</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ky</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ku</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ky</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ku</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ce</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>kách</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cích</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kem</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ky</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>kama</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="ro/k__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r>k<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="BASE__rok"/></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="Dubrovník__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r>k<s n="np"/><s n="top"/></r></p><par n="BASE__rok"/></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="l/ípa__n">
      <e><p><l>ípa</l><r>ípa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ípy</l><r>ípa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ípy</l><r>ípa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>íp</l><r>ípa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ip</l><r>ípa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ípě</l><r>ípa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ípám</l><r>ípa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ipám</l><r>ípa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ípu</l><r>ípa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ípy</l><r>ípa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ípo</l><r>ípa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ípy</l><r>ípa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ípě</l><r>ípa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ípách</l><r>ípa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ipách</l><r>ípa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ípou</l><r>ípa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ípami</l><r>ípa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ipami</l><r>ípa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="chlap/ec__n">
      <e><p><l>ec</l><r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ci</l><r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ce</l><r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ců</l><r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ci</l><r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>covi</l><r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cům</l><r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ce</l><r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ce</l><r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>če</l><r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ci</l><r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ci</l><r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>covi</l><r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cích</l><r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cem</l><r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ci</l><r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     

      <e r="LR" lm="vrabec"><p><l>brab</l><r>vrab</r></p><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="demagog"><i>demago</i><par n="demago/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dermatolog"><i>dermatolo</i><par n="demago/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="draslík"><i>draslí</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dělostřelec"><i>dělostřel</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kojenec"><i>kojen</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kulečník"><i>kuleční</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lípa"><i>l</i><par n="l/ípa__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lovec"><i>lov</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nábytek"><i>nábyt</i><par n="nábyt/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="oftalmolog"><i>oftalmolo</i><par n="demago/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="otazník"><i>otazní</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pastevec"><i>pastev</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="roztok"><i>rozto</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="soukmenovec"><i>soukmenov</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vak"><i>va</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zemědělec"><i>zeměděl</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zápisník"><i>zápisní</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bodák"><i>bodá</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="desetník"><i>desetní</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="harddisk"><i>harddis</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="košík"><i>koší</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lunapark"><i>lunapar</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nočník"><i>noční</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="památník"><i>památní</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="potlesk"><i>potles</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pytlík"><i>pytlí</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="seskok"><i>sesko</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="štěrk"><i>štěr</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trysk"><i>trys</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="větrník"><i>větrní</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zálusk"><i>zálus</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Blaník"><i>Blaní</i><par n="Dubrovník__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Brušperk"><i>Brušper</i><par n="Dubrovník__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Dubrovník" r="LR"><p><l>Dubrovni</l><r>Dubrovní</r></p><par n="Dubrovník__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Fryšták"><i>Fryštá</i><par n="Dubrovník__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Innsbruck"><i>Innsbruc</i><par n="Dubrovník__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Jeseník"><i>Jesení</i><par n="Dubrovník__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Kilmarnock"><i>Kilmarnoc</i><par n="Dubrovník__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Lemberk"><i>Lember</i><par n="Dubrovník__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Magdeburk"><i>Magdebur</i><par n="Dubrovník__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Mosambik"><i>Mosambi</i><par n="Dubrovník__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Orlík"><i>Orlí</i><par n="Dubrovník__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Pernink"><i>Pernin</i><par n="Dubrovník__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Rakovník"><i>Rakovní</i><par n="Dubrovník__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Rostock"><i>Rostoc</i><par n="Dubrovník__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Rusk"><i>Rus</i><par n="Dubrovník__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Šerák"><i>Šerá</i><par n="Dubrovník__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Štramberk"><i>Štramber</i><par n="Dubrovník__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Úštěk"><i>Úště</i><par n="Dubrovník__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Vimperk"><i>Vimper</i><par n="Dubrovník__np"/></e>
    <e lm="York"><i>Yor</i><par n="Dubrovník__np"/></e>
    <e lm="býložravec"><i>býložrav</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="herec"><i>her</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="konzervativec" r="LR"><p><l>konservativ</l><r>konzervativ</r></p><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="maratonec"><i>maraton</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="novorozenec"><i>novorozen</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pastevec"><i>pastev</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="příznivec"><i>přízniv</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="soukmenovec"><i>soukmenov</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="synovec"><i>synov</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vrabec" r="LR"><p><l>brab</l><r>vrab</r></p><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zemědělec"><i>zeměděl</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Gruzínec"><i>Gruzín</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Pákistánec"><i>Pákistán</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="saproxylofág"><i>saproxylofá</i><par n="demago/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tloušť"><i>tlouš</i><par n="tlouš/ť__n"/></e>
